Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Chapter 24 Pharmacy

Cross references. —

As to licensing provisions generally, see chapter 1 of this title.

As to podiatrists, see chapter 9 of this title.

As to chiropractors, see chapter 10 of this title.

As to dentists and dental hygienists, see chapter 15 of this title.

As to nurses, see chapter 21 of this title.

As to optometrists, see chapter 23 of this title.

As to physical therapists, see chapter 25 of this title.

As to physicians and surgeons, see chapter 26 of this title.

As to eye care practitioners, see chapter 32 of this title.

As to immunity from liability for volunteer health care professionals, see §

1-1-129

.

As to the Controlled Substances Act, see §§

35-7-1001

through

35-7-1057

.

Stated

in

Paravecchio v. Memorial Hosp., 742 P.2d 1276,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 507

(Wyo. 1987).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

25 Am. Jur. 2d Drugs, Narcotics and Poisons § 1 et seq.

Liability for child's personal injuries or death resulting from tort committed against child's mother before child was conceived, 91 ALR3d 316.

State and local administrative inspection of and administrative warrants to search pharmacies, 29 ALR4th 264.

Liability of pharmacist who accurately fills prescription for harm resulting to user, 44 ALR5th 393.

Products liability: recovery for injury or death resulting from intentional inhalation of product's fumes or vapors to produce intoxicating or similar effect, 50 ALR5th 275.

28 C.J.S. Drugs and Narcotics Supplement §§ 1 to 116.